New York, session 2025-2026, S9892.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 9 of section 190 of the state 2 finance law, as amended by chapter 379 of the laws of 2010, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 (a) The court shall dismiss a qui tam action under this article if: 5 (i) it is based on allegations or transactions which are the subject 6 of a pending civil action or an administrative action in which the state 7 or a local government is already a party; 8 (ii) the state or local government has reached a binding settlement or 9 other agreement with the person who violated section one hundred eight- 10 y-nine of this article resolving the matter [and such agreement has been 11 approved in writing by the attorney general, or by the applicable local 12 government attorney]; [or] 13 (iii) against a member of the legislature, a member of the judiciary, 14 or a senior executive branch official if the action is based on evidence 15 or information known to the state when the action was brought[.]; or 16 (iv) the action is based upon allegations or transactions that: 17 (A) are the subject of an audit, examination, investigation, or admin- 18 istrative inquiry conducted by the state, a local government, or any 19 executive or administrative agency thereof; or 20 (B) were previously the subject of an audit, examination, investi- 21 gation, or administrative inquiry conducted by the state, a local 22 government, or any executive or administrative agency thereof that 23 resulted in a final determination, resolution, or payment. 24 § 2. Section 190 of the state finance law is amended by adding a new 25 subdivision 2-a to read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15547-01-6 S. 9892 2 1 2-a. Disclosure of relator identity and basis of knowledge. In any 2 action brought pursuant to this article, the person initiating the 3 action shall, at the time of filing, plead with particularity: 4 (a) the identity of the natural person or persons bringing the allega- 5 tions; 6 (b) the nature of such person's relationship, if any, to the defend- 7 ant; and 8 (c) the manner in which such person obtained the material information 9 forming the basis of the allegations. 10 Where the action is brought by an entity, the complaint shall disclose 11 the natural person or persons who directly or indirectly control or 12 benefit from such entity. Failure to satisfy the requirements of this 13 subdivision shall constitute grounds for dismissal. 14 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to actions 15 commenced or maintained on or after such effective date.